North Dakota, session 69, HB1252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 50-24.1-40 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. There is created in the state treasury a tribal health care coordination fund.
a. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for
distribution to a tribal government in accordance with an agreement between the
department and a tribal government. The agreement between the department and a tribal
government must require the tribe to:
(1) Use the money distributed under this section for purposes related to the
ten essential services of public heathhealth identified by the federal centers for
disease control and prevention and the development or enhancement of community
health representative programs or services; however, through June 30, 2025, no
more than fifty percent, and thereafter, no more than thirty-five percent, may be
used for capital construction.
(2) Submit to the department annual reports detailing the use of the money distributed
under this section.
(3) Submit to the department every two years an audit report, conducted by an
independent licensed certified public accountant, of the tribal government use of the
money distributed under this section. A tribal government may use money
distributed under this section to pay for this audit report. At the discretion of a tribal
government, an audit may be conducted more often than every two years.
b. The distribution of moneys from the fund to a tribal government must be in proportion to
the federal funding received from care coordination agreement requests for services
originating from within that tribal nation.
c. At least annually, upon completion of any auditing and verification actions of the
department, the department shall distribute moneys from the fund to the tribal
government.
d. If a tribal government fails to file with the department a timely annual report or audit
report, the department shall withhold distribution of moneys from the fund to the tribal
government until the report is filed.
e. If an audit report or the department's review of the annual report finds a tribal government
used moneys distributed from the fund for a purpose inconsistent with this section, the
department shall withhold future distributions to that tribal government in an amount
equal to the money used improperly. The department shall distribute money withheld
from a tribal government under this subdivision if a future audit report indicates moneys
distributed from the fund are used for purposes consistent with this section.

H. B. NO. 1252 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1252.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State